Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 1.
General Provisions.

§ 20-88.32. Definitions.

In this chapter:

"Child"
means an individual, whether over or under the age of majority, who is or is alleged to be owed a duty of support by the individual's parent or who is or is alleged to be the beneficiary of a support order directed to the parent.

"Child support order"
means a support order for a child, including a child who has attained the age of majority under the law of the issuing state or foreign country.

"Convention"
means the Convention on the International Recovery of Child Support and Other Forms of Family Maintenance, concluded at The Hague on November 23, 2007.

"Duty of support"
means an obligation imposed or imposable by law to provide support for a child, spouse, or former spouse, including an unsatisfied obligation to provide support.

"Employer"
means the source of any income as defined in § 63.2-1900.

"Foreign country"
means a country, including a political subdivision thereof, other than the United States, that authorizes the issuance of support orders and:

That has been declared under the law of the United States to be a foreign reciprocating country;

That has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with the Commonwealth as provided in § 20-88.50;

That has enacted a law or established procedures for the issuance and enforcement of support orders which are substantially similar to the procedures under this chapter; or

In which the Convention is in force with respect to the United States.

"Foreign support order"
means a support order of a foreign tribunal.

"Foreign tribunal"
means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity of a foreign country which is authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a child. The term includes a competent authority under the Convention.

"Home state"
means the state or foreign country in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the time of filing of a petition or comparable pleading for support and, if a child is less than six months old, the state or foreign country in which the child lived from birth with any of them. A period of temporary absence of any of them is counted as part of the six-month or other period.

"Income"
includes earnings or other periodic entitlements to money from any source and any other property subject to withholding for support under the law of the Commonwealth.

"Income-withholding order"
means an order or other legal process directed to an obligor's employer or other debtor, to withhold support from the obligor's income as defined in § 63.2-1900.

"Initiating tribunal"
means the tribunal of a state or foreign country from which a petition or comparable pleading is forwarded or in which a petition or comparable pleading is filed for forwarding to another state or foreign country.

"Issuing foreign country"
means the foreign country in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

"Issuing state"
means the state in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

"Issuing tribunal"
means the tribunal of a state or foreign country that issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

"Law"
includes decisional and statutory law and rules and regulations having the force of law.

"Obligee"
means (i) an individual to whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child has been issued, (ii) a foreign country, state, or political subdivision of a state to which the rights under a duty of support or support order have been assigned or which has independent claims based on financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support, (iii) an individual seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual's child, or (iv) a person that is a creditor in a proceeding under Article 13 (§ 20-88.83 et seq.).

"Obligor"
means an individual, or the estate of a decedent that (i) owes or is alleged to owe a duty of support, (ii) is alleged but has not been adjudicated to be a parent of a child, (iii) is liable under a support order, or (iv) is a debtor in a proceeding under Article 13 (§ 20-88.83 et seq.).

"Outside the Commonwealth"
means a location in another state, political subdivision of a state, or a country other than the United States, whether or not the country is a foreign country.

"Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Record"
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Register"
means to file in a tribunal of the Commonwealth a support order or judgment determining parentage of a child issued in another state or a foreign country.

"Registering tribunal"
means a tribunal in which a support order or judgment determining parentage of a child is registered.

"Responding state"
means a state or a foreign country in which a petition or comparable pleading for support or to determine parentage of a child is filed or to which a petition or comparable pleading is forwarded for filing from another state or a foreign country.

"Responding tribunal"
means the authorized tribunal in a responding state or foreign country.

"Spousal-support order"
means a support order for a spouse or former spouse of the obligor.

"State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession under the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian nation or tribe.

"Support enforcement agency"
means a public official, governmental entity, or private agency authorized to (i) seek enforcement of support orders or laws relating to the duty of support, (ii) seek establishment or modification of child support, (iii) request determination of parentage of a child, (iv) attempt to locate obligors or their assets, or (v) request determination of the controlling child support order. A support enforcement agency of the Commonwealth is not authorized to establish or enforce a support order for spousal support only.

"Support order"
means a judgment, decree, order, decision, or directive, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued in a state or foreign country for the benefit of a child, a spouse, or a former spouse, which provides for monetary support, health care, arrearages, retroactive support, or reimbursement for financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support. The term may include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, automatic adjustment, reasonable attorney's fees, and other relief.

"Tribunal"
means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a child; however, the support enforcement agency of the Commonwealth has no authority to establish or enforce a support order for spousal support only.

(1994, c. 673; 1995, c. 484; 1996, cc. 882, 925; 1997, cc. 797, 897; 1998, c. 727; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

Cross references.

- As to child support enforcement, see
§
63.2-1900 et seq.

Uniform law cross references.

- For other signatory state provisions of the 1996 or 2001 Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala.
§§
30-3D-101 to 30-3D-902.

Alaska: Alaska Stat.
§§
25.25.101 to 25.25.903.

Arizona: A.R.S.
§§
25-1201 to 25-1342.

Arkansas: A.C.A.

§§

9-17-101 to 9-17-902.

California: California Fam. Code
§§
5700.101 to 5700.905.

Colorado: C.R.S.

§§

14-14-101 to 14-14-113.

Delaware: 13 Del. C.

§§

6-101 to 6-903.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code
§§
46-301.01 to 46-309.01.

Florida: Fla. Stat.
§§
88.0011 to 88.9031.

Georgia: Ga. Code
§§
19-11-100 to 19-11-191.

Hawaii: H.R.S.
§§
576B-101 to 576B-902.

Idaho: Idaho Code

§§

7-1001 to 7-1062.

Illinois: 750 I.L.C.S. 22/100 to 22/999.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. 31-18.5-1-1 to 31-18.5-9-1.

Iowa: Iowa Code
§§
252K.101 to 252K.904.

Kansas: K.S.A.
§§
23-36,101 to 23-36,903.

Kentucky: K.R.S. 407.5101 to 407.5902.

Louisiana: La. Ch.C. Art. 1301.1 - 1309.3.

Maine: 19-A M.R.S.
§§
2801 to 3401.

Maryland: Family Law

§§

10-301 to 10-371.

Massachusetts: Mass. Ann. Laws c. 209D

§§

1-101 to 9-902.

Michigan: M.C.L.S.
§§
552.1101 to 552.1901.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat.
§§
518C.101 to 518C.902.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann.
§§
93-25-101 to 93-25-903.

Missouri:
§§
454.849 to 454.999 R.S.Mo.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno.
§§
40-5-1001 to 40-5-1092.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb.
§§
42-701 to 42-751.01.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann.
§§
130.0902 to 130.802.

New Hampshire: R.S.A..
§§
546-B:1 to 546-B:59.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat. 2A:4-30.65 to 2A:4-30.122.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann.
§§
40-6A-101 to 40-6A-903.

New York: NY CLS Family Ct. Act
§§
580-101 to 580-905.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat.
§§
52C-1-100 to 52C-9-902.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code 14-12.2-01 to 14-12.2-49.

Ohio: O.R.C. Ann.
§§
3115.101 to 3115.903.

Oklahoma: 43 Okl. St. Ann.
§§
601-101 to 601-903.

Pennsylvania: 23 Pa. C.S.A.
§§
7101 to 7902.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws
§§
15-23.1-100 to 15-23.1-907.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann.
§§
63-17-2900 to 63-17-4040.

South Dakota S.D. Codified Laws 25-9C-101 to 25-9C-903.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann.
§§
36-5-2001 to 36-5-2902.

Texas: Tex. Fam. Code
§§
159.001 to 159.902.

Utah: Utah Code Ann.
§
78B-14-101 to 78B-14-902.

Vermont: 15B V.S.A
§§
1101 to 1903.

Virgin Islands: 16 V.I.C.
§§
391 through 451.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash.
§§
26.21A.005 to 26.21A.915.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code
§§
48-16-101 to 48-16-903.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat.
§§
769.101 to 769.903.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat.
§§
20-4-139 to 20-4-194.

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 deleted "amounts for child or spousal" preceding "support" in the "Income-withholding order" paragraph, "the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, or the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act" in the "Initiating state" and "Responding state" paragraphs, added the paragraph defining "Record," rewrote the paragraph defining "State," in the paragraph defining "Support enforcement agency" substituted "location of" for "or locating" and inserted "or determination of the controlling child support order," inserted "issued by a tribunal" in the paragraph defining "Support order," and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, added the definitions of "Convention," "Foreign country," "Foreign Support order," "Foreign tribunal," "Outside the Commonwealth," and "Person"; deleted definition of "Initiating state"; and rewrote the remaining definitions.

Law review.

- For 1994 survey on Virginia domestic relations law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (1994).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
57, 58.1, 78, 78.1; 8A M.J. Extradition,

§

2; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife,

§

23; 9B M.J. Illegitimate Children,

§

5; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§§

4, 19.

§ 20-88.32:1. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(2015, c. 727.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2015, c. 727, cl. 3 made this section effective April 15, 2015, by emergency.

§ 20-88.33. Tribunals of the Commonwealth and support enforcement agency.

The juvenile and domestic relations district courts, circuit courts, and the Department of Social Services are the tribunals of the Commonwealth.

The Department of Social Services is the support enforcement agency of the Commonwealth.

(1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 deleted "or family courts upon their creation" and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 20-88.34. Remedies cumulative.

Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law or the recognition of a foreign support order on the basis of comity.

This chapter does not provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of the Commonwealth or grant a tribunal of the Commonwealth jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under this chapter.

(1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 added the language "including the recognition" to the end of the section.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted the subsection A and B designations and substituted "or the recognition of a foreign support order" for "including the recognition of a support order of a foreign country or political subdivision" in subsection A.

Applied

in Commonwealth ex rel. Gagne v. Chamberlain, 31 Va. App. 533, 525 S.E.2d 19 (2000).

§ 20-88.34:1. Application of chapter to resident of foreign country and foreign support proceeding.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth shall apply Articles 1 through 9 (§ 20-88.32 et seq.) and, as applicable, Article 13 (§ 20-88.83 et seq.) to a support proceeding involving a foreign support order, a foreign tribunal, or an obligee, obligor, or child residing in a foreign country.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth that is requested to recognize and enforce a support order on the basis of comity may apply the procedural and substantive provisions of Articles 1 through 9 (§ 20-88.32 et seq.).

Article 13 (§ 20-88.83 et seq.) applies only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of Article 13 is inconsistent with Articles 1 through 9 (§ 20-88.32 et seq.), Article 13 controls.

(2015, c. 727.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2015, c. 727, cl. 3 made this section effective April 15, 2015, by emergency.